Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.033

Pro tem board members—Limits—Duties.

Upon request of the board, and with approval of the director, the board chair shall appoint up to two individuals to serve as pro tem members of the board. The appointments are limited, as defined by the board chair, for the purpose of participating as a temporary member of the board on any combination of one or more committees or formal disciplinary hearing panels. An appointed individual must meet the same qualifications as a regular member of the board. While serving as a board member pro tem, an appointed person has all the powers, duties, and immunities of a regular member of the board and is entitled to the same compensation, including travel expenses, in accordance with RCW 18.43.030. A pro tem appointment may not last for more than one hundred eighty days unless approved by the director.

[ 1997 c 247 s 1.]